src-fst-affixes-verbs.lexc.md
# Nenets Verb inflection

**LEXICON V_** for unassigned verbs

## ONE-SYLLABLE STEMS WITH STEM-FINAL VOWEL
* **LEXICON IV_Е** есь:е

**LEXICON IV_МЭ** 

**LEXICON TV_МЭ** 

**LEXICON VR_МЭ** 

**LEXICON IV_МЫ** 

**LEXICON TV_МЫ** 

**LEXICON VA_НЁ** 

**LEXICON VA_НИ** 

**LEXICON IV_НИ** 

**LEXICON IV_НО** 

**LEXICON IV_НУ** 

**LEXICON IV_НУ-Pal/Var** 

**LEXICON VR_НУ** 

**LEXICON VR_НУ-Pal/Var** 

**LEXICON TV_НУ** 

**LEXICON TV_НУ-Pal/Var** 

**LEXICON IV_НУ/ТУ** 

* **LEXICON IV_ҢЭ** ңэсь:ңэ
**LEXICON IV_ҢЭ** 

**LEXICON IV_ҢЭ-Pal/Var** 


**LEXICON IV_ТУ** 

**LEXICON TV_ТУ** 

**LEXICON IV_ХО** 


**LEXICON TV_ХО** 

**LEXICON VR_ХО-Pal/Var** 

**LEXICON IV_ХЭ** 

## TWO-SYLLABLE STEMS WITH STEM-FINAL VOWEL

* **LEXICON IV_НАМДА** намдась:намда
**LEXICON IV_НАМДА** 

**LEXICON TV_НАМДА** 

**LEXICON VR_НАМДА** 

**LEXICON IV_ВАДЮ** 

**LEXICON TV_ВАДЮ** 

* **LEXICON IV_ЯКУ** якась:яка

**LEXICON IV_ИЛЕ** 

**LEXICON IV_ИЛЕ-Pal/Var** Work needed for variation 2013-03-04

**LEXICON VR_ИЛЕ** 

**LEXICON VR_ИЛЕ-Pal/Var**  Work needed for variation 2013-09-05

**LEXICON TV_ИЛЕ** 

**LEXICON IV_НЕНЫ** 

**LEXICON IV_ҢЭСУ** 

**LEXICON TV_ҢЭСУ** 

**LEXICON IV_ПЭБЮ** 

**LEXICON IV_ПЭБЮ-Pal/Var** 

**LEXICON TV_ПЭБЮ** 


**LEXICON IV_ХАДАБАСЬ** 


**LEXICON TV_ХАДАБАСЬ** 


* **LEXICON IV_ХАДА** хадась:хада

* **LEXICON TV_ХАДА** хадась:хада

**LEXICON VR_ХАДА** 

**LEXICON IV_ЮХУ** 

**LEXICON TV_ЮХУ** 


### THREE-SYLLABLE STEMS WITH STEM-FINAL VOWEL
**LEXICON IV_ЛАХАНА** 

**LEXICON IV_ЛАХАНА-Pal/Var** 

**LEXICON VR_ЛАХАНА** 

**LEXICON TV_ЛАХАНА** 
* **@P.CONJ.ObjAll@+TV:@P.CONJ.ObjAll@ V-NEW_ЛАХАНА       ; ** 3-syll

**LEXICON TV_ЛАХАНА-Pal/Var** 

**LEXICON IV_ҢЭДАРА** 
**LEXICON TV_ҢЭДАРА** 
**LEXICON VR_ҢЭДАРА** 

**LEXICON IV_СЯНАКУ** 

**LEXICON IV_ЯˮАВЛУ** 
* Yaml: **V-yaqwlasj**

**LEXICON IV_ЯˮАВЛУ-Pal/Var** 


**LEXICON TV_ЯˮАВЛУ** 

### ONE-SYLLABLE STEMS WITH STEM-FINAL CONSONANT
* **LEXICON IV_МАН** манзь:ма%{нңʼØ%} 
* Yaml: **manzj**

**LEXICON IV_МИН** 

**LEXICON IV_МИН-Pal/Var** 

**LEXICON TV_МИН** 

**LEXICON VR_МИН** 

**LEXICON IV_САС** 


* LEXICON TV_САС  манэць:манэ







### TWO-SYLLABLE STEMS WITH STEM-FINAL CONSONANT
* **LEXICON IV_НЭКАЛ** 


* **LEXICON IV_ҢАДИМ/ҢАРАМ** 2013-12-16









## AFTER +TV, +IV, +Aux, +Refl
Not yet written.

## CONJUGATION BY STEM TYPE

### ONE-SYLLABLE STEMS WITH STEM-FINAL VOWEL

*  PRC-NEG ; 	+PrcNeg +PrcFut

*  PRC-NEG ; 	+PrcNeg +PrcFut
* :%^VowRaise PRC-NEG ; 	+PrcNeg +PrcFut

V_refl 


*  PRC-NEG ; 	+PrcNeg +PrcFut
* :%^VowRaise PRC-NEG ; 	+PrcNeg +PrcFut

*  PRC-NEG ; 	+PrcNeg +PrcFut

*  PRC-NEG ; 	+PrcNeg +PrcFut

*  PRC-NEG ; 	+PrcNeg +PrcFut

*  PRC-NEG ; 	+PrcNeg +PrcFut

V_refl 2013-03-04


*  PRC-NEG ; 	+PrcNeg +PrcFut

*  PRC-NEG ; 	+PrcNeg +PrcFut

*  PRC-NEG ; 	+PrcNeg +PrcFut

* Yaml: **V-xosj**
*  PRC-NEG ; 	+PrcNeg +PrcFut

*  PRC-NEG ; 	+PrcNeg +PrcFut


### TWO-SYLLABLE STEMS WITH STEM-FINAL VOWEL
*  PRC-NEG ; 	+PrcNeg +PrcFut
* :%^VowRaise PRC-NEG ; 	+PrcNeg +PrcFut


* **LEXICON V-01_ЯКУ** якась:яка
*  PRC-NEG ; 	+PrcNeg +PrcFut


* LEXICON V-01_НЕНЫ  2013-09-18 This is merely a copy of V-01_МЫ
*  PRC-NEG ; 	+PrcNeg +PrcFut
* :%^VowRaise PRC-NEG ; 	+PrcNeg +PrcFut

* ** V_Fut_ҢГУ ; ** is this the stem to use for +Fut+Mod/prob
*  PRC-NEG ; 	+PrcNeg +PrcFut

V_refl 2013-03-04
*  PRC-NEG ; 	+PrcNeg +PrcFut

*  PRC-NEG ; 	+PrcNeg +PrcFut
* :%^VowRaise PRC-NEG ; 	+PrcNeg +PrcFut

* Yaml: **V-pewasj**
has vowel loss






* *яˮавла%^VowRaise%>ˮ*
* *яˮавлу0%>ˮ*
* *тенева%^VowLoss%>ˮ*
* *тенев00%>ˮ*



* Yaml: **V-xadabasj**
* *яˮавла%^VowRaise%>ˮ*
* *яˮавлу0%>ˮ*
* *тенева%^VowLoss%>ˮ*
* *тенев00%>ˮ*


*  PRC-NEG ; 	+PrcNeg +PrcFut

V_refl 
*  PRC-NEG ; 	+PrcNeg +PrcFut
*  PRC-NEG ; 	+PrcNeg +PrcFut

*  PRC-NEG ; 	+PrcNeg +PrcFut
* :%^VowRaise PRC-NEG ; 	+PrcNeg +PrcFut

### THREE-SYLLABLE STEMS WITH STEM-FINAL VOWEL
а > э in Pl Oc 
*  PRC-NEG ; 	+PrcNeg +PrcFut

V_refl 2013-03-04  а > ы (ъя before х)
*  PRC-NEG ; 	+PrcNeg +PrcFut

*  PRC-NEG ; 	+PrcNeg +PrcFut
* :%^VowRaise PRC-NEG ; 	+PrcNeg +PrcFut

* **LEXICON V-01_ЯˮАВЛУ ** яˮавлась:яˮавла
*  PRC-NEG ; 	+PrcNeg +PrcFut
* :%^VowRaise PRC-NEG ; 	+PrcNeg +PrcFut


### ONE-SYLLABLE STEMS WITH STEM-FINAL CONSONANT
* **LEXICON V-01_МАН** манзь:ма%{нңʼØ%} 
* Yaml: **manzj**
*  PRC-NEG ; 	+PrcNeg +PrcFut

*  PRC-NEG ; 	+PrcNeg +PrcFut



*  PRC-NEG ; 	+PrcNeg +PrcFut

* LEXICON V-01_САС  манэць:манэ

* :С1 PRC-NEG_МАДАВЭЙ ; 	+PrcNeg +PrcFut


* **LEXICON V-NEW_ТИР**







V_refl 2013-03-04

*  PRC-NEG ; 	+PrcNeg +PrcFut


### TWO-SYLLABLE STEMS WITH STEM-FINAL CONSONANT
* **LEXICON V-01_НЭКАЛ** нэкалць:нэкал

*  PRC-NEG ; 	+PrcNeg +PrcFut

*  PRC-NEG ; 	+PrcNeg +PrcFut



V_refl 2013-03-04

Mutual verbal conjugation
* **LEXICON IND-AOR** All except Sg3 Du3




































Preterite 1 # This should be for ConjPrt and NarrPrt also.














* +Ind:%>я IND-AOR-RCSG1	;  This should be schwa or something

Other moods
сь in 2nd, 4th etc non-final syllable 









* **LEXICON V_PREC ** Hort

































* **+Mod/des:%>рава MUTUAL-PERSON-NON-OCPL_NORAISING ; ** Sg3 and Pl3








































* **LEXICON SG3-PRED-AOR/PRET1 ** V_AUD picks up possessor indices and comes here

Mutual person ending for nonindicative moods


















This need separating 2013-04-23























Object


Reflexive


Reflexive Preterite

Non-finites




* **+PrcFut:%>%{вм%}анда K ;**

* **+PrcFut:%>%{вм%}нда K ;** Should this form be here 2013-11-25


* **+PrcFut:%>%{вм%}нда K ;** Should this form be here 2013-11-25





no vowel loss in stem



* *яˮавла%^VowRaise%>ˮ*
* *яˮавлу0%>ˮ*
* *тенева%^VowLoss%>ˮ*
* *тенев00%>ˮ*



* **LEXICON V-NEW_НАМДА ** намдась:намда schwa-final


* *яˮавла%^VowRaise%>ˮ*
* *яˮавлу0%>ˮ*
* *тенева%^VowLoss%>ˮ*
* *тенев00%>ˮ*





* *яˮавла%^VowRaise%>ˮ*
* *яˮавлу0%>ˮ*



* Yaml: **V-xosjTS**
* **+Subord+PxSg1:%>бˮни K ; ** Do all odd-syllabled words need this?




◊_subj

◊_obj 





* **+PrcFut+Pred+Nom+PxSg1:%>вндадав K ; ** Vowel removed
* **+PrcFut+Pred+Nom+PxSg1:%>вндадув K ; ** Vowel removed
* **+PrcFut+Pred+Acc+PxSg1:%>вндадав K ; ** Vowel removed
* **+PrcFut+Pred+Acc+PxSg1:%>вндадув K ; ** Vowel removed

























◊_subj









◊_obj 



◊_obj 














* **LEXICON V-NEW_BI-SYLL-MUTUAL-RAISE/NO ** raise/no


















































































* **LEXICON IND-AOR/PRT1-OCPL3_ян ** ODD-SYLL



























* **LEXICON MOD/INT-SC_бца ** ??
































* **+PrcFut+Pred+Nom+PxSg1:%>вндадав K ; ** Vowel removed
* **+PrcFut+Pred+Nom+PxSg1:%>вндадув K ; ** Vowel removed
* **+PrcFut+Pred+Acc+PxSg1:%>вндадав K ; ** Vowel removed
* **+PrcFut+Pred+Acc+PxSg1:%>вндадув K ; ** Vowel removed














* * *
<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [../src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc](http://github.com/giellalt/lang-yrk/blob/main/../src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc)</small>
